Idaho statutes. Title 44 LABOR
Chapter 25
MOBILE HOME REHABILITATION

Sec.

§ 44-2501. Legislative intent.

In order to ensure a continued supply of safe, affordable housing, the state of Idaho hereby adopts a rehabilitation program for existing mobile homes constructed prior to June 15, 1976, the effective date of the federal manufactured housing and safety standards act (HUD code), that are currently sited within Idaho or that may be brought into the state after the effective date of this act. It is legislative intent that the relocation and installation of these homes be approved when the rehabilitation on the home has been completed as required in this chapter and proof of compliance has been issued by the administrator of the division of building safety of the state of Idaho.

§ 44-2502. Application of chapter — Rehabilitation required — Certificate of compliance.

This chapter shall apply to the installation of mobile homes constructed prior to June 15, 1976, within the jurisdiction of a city or county requiring an installation permit pursuant to section 44-2202, Idaho Code.

Before a permit for the installation of the mobile home may be issued, the home must meet the rehabilitation requirements specified in this chapter and receive a certificate of compliance from the administrator of the division of building safety of the state of Idaho.

Upon submission of the rehabilitation form required pursuant to section 44-2504, Idaho Code, and any other information required by the administrator to establish compliance with this chapter, the administrator shall issue a certificate of compliance to the homeowner. The certificate of compliance must be presented to the local jurisdiction before a permit for the installation of the home may be issued.

Upon receipt of the certificate of compliance, the local jurisdiction shall issue the installation permit in the same manner as the permit would be issued with respect to a mobile/manufactured home for which rehabilitation is not required. No zoning or other ordinance or policy of the local jurisdiction prohibiting relocation or installation of a mobile home to which this chapter applies shall be effective to prohibit the relocation or installation of a mobile home for which a certificate of compliance has been issued in accordance with this chapter.

§ 44-2503. Rehabilitation requirements.

The mobile home shall meet the following rehabilitation requirements:

A smoke detector (which may be a single station alarm device) shall be installed on any wall in a hallway or space communicating with each bedroom area and the living area on the living area side and, when located in a hallway, the detector shall be between the return air intake and the living area. Each smoke detector shall be installed in accordance with its listing and the top of the detector shall be located on a wall four (4) inches to twelve (12) inches below the ceiling. The detector may be battery-powered or may be connected to an electrical outlet box by a permanent wiring method into a general electrical branch circuit, without any switch between the over current protection device protecting the branch circuit and the detector.

The walls, ceilings and doors of each compartment containing a gas-fired furnace or water heater shall be lined with five-sixteenth (5/16) inch gypsum board, unless the door opens to the exterior of the home, in which case, the door may be all metal construction. All exterior compartments shall seal to the interior of the mobile home.

Each room designated expressly for sleeping purposes shall have an exterior exit door or at least one (1) outside egress window or other approved exit device with a minimum clear dimension of twenty-two (22) inches and a minimum clear opening of five (5) square feet. The bottom of the exit shall not be more than thirty-six (36) inches above the floor.

All electrical systems shall be tested for continuity to assure that metallic parts are properly bonded, tested for operation to demonstrate that all equipment is connected and in working order, and given a polarity check to determine that connections are proper. The electrical system shall be properly protected for the required amperage load. If the unit wiring is of aluminum conductors, all receptacles and switches rated twenty (20) amperes or less directly connected to the aluminum conductors shall be marked CO/ALR. Exterior receptacles other than heat tape receptacles shall be of the ground fault circuit interrupter (GFI) type. Conductors of dissimilar metals (copper/aluminum or copper clad aluminum) must be connected in accordance with section 110-14 of the national electrical code.

The mobile home’s gas piping shall be tested with the appliance valves removed from the piping system and piping capped at those areas. The piping system shall withstand a pressure of at least six (6) inch mercury or three (3) psi gauge for a period of not less than ten (10) minutes without showing any drop in pressure. Pressure shall be measured with a mercury manometer or a slope gauge calibrated so as to read in increments of not greater than one-tenth (1/10) pound or an equivalent device. The source of normal operating pressure shall be isolated before the pressure test is made. After the appliance connections are reinstalled, the piping system and connections shall be tested with line pressure of not less than ten (10) inches nor more than fourteen (14) inches water column air pressure. The appliance connections shall be tested for leakage with soapy water or a bubble solution. All gas furnaces and water heaters shall be vented to the exterior in accordance with chapter 9 of the uniform mechanical code.

A full water or air pressure test will be performed on the mobile home’s water and sewer system.

Water piping shall be tested and proven tight under a water pressure not less than the working pressure under which it is to be used. The water used for tests shall be obtained from a potable source of supply. A fifty (50) pound per square inch (344.5kPa) air pressure may be substituted for the water test. In either method of test, the piping shall withstand a test without leaking for a period of not less than fifteen (15) minutes.
(b) A water test shall be applied to the drainage and vent system either in its entirety or in sections. If applied to the entire system, all openings in the piping shall be tightly closed, except at the highest opening, and the system filled with water to the point of overflow. If the system is tested in sections, each opening shall be tightly plugged except the highest opening of the section under the test and each section shall be filled with water, but no section shall be tested with less than a ten (10) foot (3m) head of water. In testing successive sections, at least the upper ten (10) feet (3m) of the next preceding section shall be tested, so that no joint or pipe in the structure, except the uppermost ten (10) feet (3m) of the system, shall have been submitted to a test of less than a ten (10) foot (3m) head of water. The water shall be kept in the system or in the portion under testing for at least fifteen (15) minutes before inspection starts. The system shall be tight at all points.

All repairs or other work necessary to bring the mobile home into compliance with the requirements of this section shall be completed before a certificate of compliance may be issued.

§ 44-2504. Rehabilitation form and checklist — Administrative fee — Rules.

The administrator of the division of building safety shall, by rule, establish a mobile home rehabilitation form and checkoff list. The form shall be completed and signed by an authorized representative of an Idaho licensed manufactured home service company or installer or dealer holding an installer’s license. Electrical, gas, water and sewer inspections and any necessary repairs must be performed by a person or company properly licensed and authorized to perform the work under Idaho law, with the person or company performing the inspections and repairs to be noted on the rehabilitation form. A properly completed rehabilitation form shall be presented to the division of building safety before a certificate of compliance may be issued.

The administrator of the division of building safety may, by rule, establish an administrative fee to cover the costs of administering the provisions of this chapter.

In addition to the rulemaking authority provided in this section, the administrator of the division of building safety may promulgate rules in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.